Colorado, session 2026A, HB1224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-201.5, amend
(6) and (8) as follows:
38-12-201.5. Definitions.
As used in this part 2 and in parts 11 and 14 of this article 12, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(6) (a) (I) "Mobile home park" or "park" means a parcel of land used
for the accommodation of five or more mobile homes for which the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

management or landlord has a rental agreement with a tenant for a mobile
home or lot or is receiving rent payments for a mobile home or lot from a
tenant RESIDENT or a third party.
(II) "MOBILE HOME PARK" OR "PARK" INCLUDES PARCELS OF LAND
WHERE THE MANAGEMENT OR LANDLORD OWNS ALL OF THE MOBILE HOMES
IN THE MOBILE HOME PARK.
(III) "Mobile home park" OR "PARK" does not include mobile home
subdivisions or property zoned for manufactured home subdivisions.
(b) For purposes of this definition SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, the parcel of land comprising the mobile home park does not need
to be contiguous, but must be in the same neighborhood as determined by
the division.
(8) "Premises" means a mobile home park and existing facilities and
appurtenances of the park, including furniture and utilities where
applicable, and grounds, areas, and existing facilities held out for the use of
home owners OR RESIDENTS generally or the use of which is promised to
home owners OR RESIDENTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-203, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
38-12-203. Reasons for termination.
(1) The management of a mobile home park may terminate a
tenancy only for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Except in the case of a home owner who cures a noncompliance
as described in section 38-12-202 (3), failure of the home owner to comply
with local ordinances and state laws and rules relating to mobile homes and
mobile home lots. A LANDLORD MAY PURSUE THE TERMINATION OF A
TENANCY ON THESE GROUNDS ONLY IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE,
OR AN AGENCY OR DIVISION OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR THE STATE HAS
ISSUED A FINAL ORDER FINDING THAT A VIOLATION OF A LOCAL ORDINANCE
OR A STATE LAW OR RULE RELATED TO MOBILE HOMES AND MOBILE HOME
LOTS HAS OCCURRED.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-204, add (4.5)
as follows:
38-12-204. Nonpayment of rent - notice required for rent
increase - limitation on rent increases - notice of rent increase
prohibition - definition.
(4.5) A LANDLORD THAT IS TEMPORARILY PROHIBITED FROM
INCREASING RENT OR ISSUING A NOTICE OF RENT INCREASE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOTIFY ALL RESIDENTS THAT THEIR
RENT SHALL NOT BE INCREASED WHILE THE PROHIBITION IS EFFECTIVE AND
THE REASON FOR THE TEMPORARY PROHIBITION. THE LANDLORD SHALL
PROVIDE THE NOTICE IN WRITING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
38-12-212.9, AND WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE LANDLORD
IS NOTIFIED THAT THEY ARE TEMPORARILY PROHIBITED FROM RAISING RENT.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-217, amend
(2)(a) introductory portion, (2)(a)(II), (3), (5)(a), (5)(b), (6)(b), and (13);
and add (14.5) as follows:
38-12-217. Notice of change of use - notice of sale or closure of
park - opportunity for home owners to purchase - procedures -
exemptions - enforcement - private right of action - definitions.
(2) Notice - requirements.
(a) To provide notice as required by subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of
this section, the A landlord shall mail the notice in both English and Spanish
by certified mail to:
(II) The CLERK OF THE municipality or, if the park is in an
unincorporated area, the COUNTY CLERK OF THE county within which the
park is located;
(3) Contents of notice.
(a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3)(f) OF THIS SECTION, the
notice given pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section must include notice
of home owners' rights and remedies under this section.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

(b) If the triggering event involves a potential sale, the notice must
also include:
(I) A description of the property to be purchased;
(II) The price, terms, and conditions of an acceptable offer the
landlord has received to sell the mobile home park or the price or terms and
conditions for which the landlord intends to sell the park; and
(III) A STATEMENT THAT THE LANDLORD MUST PROVIDE THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION AND DOCUMENTATION THAT IS IN THE
LANDLORD'S POSSESSION OR CONTROL TO A HOME OWNER UPON REQUEST:
(A) AN EXPLANATION AND DOCUMENTATION OF THE BASIS FOR THE
PURCHASE PRICE, SUCH AS AGGREGATE RENTAL DATA, RENT PROJECTIONS,
RECENT APPRAISALS OF THE PROPERTY, OR FORMULAS THAT USE NONPUBLIC
MARKET DATA;
(B) DISCLOSURE OF THE AGE OF MAJOR INFRASTRUCTURE IN THE
MOBILE HOME PARK, INCLUDING THE PARK'S WATER LINES, SEWER LINES,
WASTEWATER TREATMENT EQUIPMENT, DRINKING WATER TREATMENT
EQUIPMENT, PLUMBING, AND ELECTRICAL EQUIPMENT AND ELECTRICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE;
(C) DOCUMENTATION OF INFRASTRUCTURE INSPECTIONS,
MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR SERVICES THAT HAVE OCCURRED IN THE MOBILE
HOME PARK IN THE PREVIOUS THREE YEARS;
(D) THE MOST UP-TO-DATE RENT ROLL AND ANY DOCUMENTATION,
WITH PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION REDACTED, THAT SHOWS
CURRENT RENTS, CHARGES, OUTSTANDING BALANCES, INFORMATION
REGARDING LANDLORD OWNERSHIP OF ANY MOBILE HOMES IN THE MOBILE
HOME PARK, AND THE CURRENT VACANCY RATE OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK;
AND
(E) OPERATING EXPENSES AND INCOME FOR THE MOBILE PARK FOR
THE PREVIOUS THREE YEARS ON A YEAR-BY-YEAR BASIS WITH SPECIFIC LINE
ITEMS FOR RENTS; FEES; ANY ELECTRIC, GAS, WATER, SEWER, OR SOLID
WASTE DISPOSAL UTILITY BILLS; ANY OTHER RECURRING BILLS; AND ANY
INVOICES OVER FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

(IV) Any other terms or conditions which, if not met, would be
sufficient grounds, in the landlord's discretion, to reject an offer from a
group of home owners or their assignees.
(c) The price, terms, and conditions stated in the notice must be
universal and applicable to all potential buyers and must not be specific to
and prohibitive of a group or association of home owners or their assignees
making a successful offer to purchase the park.
(d) (I) IF THE POTENTIAL SALE IS A PORTFOLIO SALE THAT INCLUDES
REAL PROPERTY OR STRUCTURES NOT LOCATED IN THE MOBILE HOME PARK
IN ADDITION TO THE MOBILE HOME PARK, THE NOTICE MUST INCLUDE ANY
CHANGE OR DISCOUNT IN THE PRICE, TERMS, OR CONDITIONS OF A PROPOSED
SALE THAT INCLUDES MORE THAN ONE PIECE OF REAL PROPERTY OR
STRUCTURES NOT LOCATED IN THE MOBILE HOME PARK.
(II) ANY CHANGE OR DISCOUNT DISCLOSED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION MUST ALSO BE MADE AVAILABLE TO
HOME OWNERS OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK ON THE SAME TERMS AND WITH
THE SAME PROPORTIONATE DISCOUNT, EVEN IF THE HOME OWNERS SUBMIT
AN OFFER TO PURCHASE ONLY THE MOBILE HOME PARK.
(III) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE PROPORTIONATE
DISCOUNT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3)(d)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE TOTAL
DISCOUNT THAT APPLIES TO THE PORTFOLIO SALE REPRESENTED AS A
PERCENTAGE MUST BE APPLIED PRO RATA TO THE PRICE OF ANY INDIVIDUAL
MOBILE HOME PARK INVOLVED IN THE PORTFOLIO SALE.
(e) The information regarding the proposed sale and the price, terms,
and conditions of an acceptable offer may be shared for the purposes of
evaluating or obtaining financing for the prospective transaction, but all
persons who THAT receive the information shall otherwise keep it
confidential if the landlord or the landlord's agent so requests.
(f) IF A TRIGGERING EVENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II)(H)
OF THIS SECTION OCCURS, THE NOTICE PROVIDED BY THE LANDLORD
PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 38-12-217 (2) AND (3) MUST ALSO DISCLOSE IF A
PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT HAS BEEN EXECUTED AND INCLUDE A
STATEMENT THAT A LANDLORD MUST PROVIDE A COPY OF THE PURCHASE
AND SALE AGREEMENT TO A HOME OWNER UPON REQUEST PURSUANT TO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

SECTION 38-12-217 (5)(a)(I)(B).
(5) Landlord's duty to consider offer. A landlord that has given
notice as required by subsection (1)(a) of this section shall:
(a) (I) Provide documents, data, and other information in response
to reasonable requests for information from a group or association of home
owners or their assignees participating in the opportunity to purchase that
would enable them to prepare an offer, WHICH DOCUMENTS, DATA, OR
INFORMATION MUST INCLUDE:
(A) THE INFORMATION, DOCUMENTATION, AND DATA DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION;
(B) AN UNREDACTED COPY OF THE PURCHASE AND SALE
AGREEMENT; AND
(C) ANY OTHER DUE DILIGENCE INFORMATION.
(II) The documents, data, and other information provided PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION may be shared for the purposes of
evaluating or obtaining financing for the prospective transaction, but all
persons who receive A PERSON THAT RECEIVES the information shall
otherwise keep it confidential if the landlord or the landlord's agent so
requests.
(III) A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE THE DOCUMENTS, DATA, AND
OTHER INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION
WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE LANDLORD RECEIVES THE
REQUEST FOR INFORMATION.
(b) (I) Negotiate in good faith with a group or association of home
owners or their assignees.
(II) For purposes of this subsection (5)(b), negotiating in good faith
includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Evaluating an offer to purchase from a group of home owners
or their assignees without consideration of the time period for closing; the
type of financing or payment method; whether or not the offer is contingent
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

on financing or payment method; or whether or not the offer is contingent
on INSPECTIONS, financing, an appraisal, or title work, OR THE DUE
DILIGENCE PERIOD REQUIRED BY THE HOME OWNERS OR THEIR LENDERS OR
DONORS; and
(B) Providing a written response within seven calendar days of
AFTER receiving an offer from a group of home owners or their assignees.
(II.5) The written response DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(b)(II) OF
THIS SECTION must accept or reject the offer and, if the offer is rejected,
must state:
(A) The current price, terms, or conditions of an acceptable offer
that the landlord has received to sell the mobile home park if the price,
terms, or conditions have changed since the landlord gave notice to the
home owners pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) Why the landlord is rejecting the offer from a group of home
owners and what terms and conditions must be included in a subsequent
offer for the landlord to potentially accept it.
(III) The price, terms, and conditions of an acceptable offer stated
in the response must be universal and applicable to all potential buyers and
must not be specific to and prohibitive of a group or association of home
owners or their assignees making a successful offer to purchase the park.
(6) Expiration of opportunity to purchase.
(b) A landlord shall give a group or association of home owners or
their assignees an additional one hundred twenty days after the
one-hundred-twenty-day period provided by subsection (4)(a) of this section
to close on the purchase of the mobile home park. THE
ONE-HUNDRED-TWENTY-DAY PERIOD TO CLOSE MUST INCLUDE AT LEAST A
NINETY-DAY DUE DILIGENCE PERIOD.
(13) (a) To qualify for an exemption under subsection (12) of this
section, a transaction must not be made in bad faith, must be made for a
legitimate business purpose or a legitimate familial purpose consistent with
the exemptions listed in subsection (12) of this section, and must not be
made for the primary purpose of avoiding the opportunity-to-purchase
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

provisions set forth in this section.
(b) (I) EXCEPT FOR A SALE OR TRANSFER DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(12) OF THIS SECTION AND A SALE CONDUCTED AS A FEDERAL INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE SECTION 1031 EXCHANGE, A PROPOSED SALE OF A MOBILE
HOME PARK MUST BE CONDUCTED AS AN ARMS-LENGTH TRANSACTION WITH
THE LANDLORD AND BUYER ACTING INDEPENDENTLY AND IN GOOD FAITH.
(II) THE LANDLORD OF A MOBILE HOME PARK SHALL NOT COLLUDE
WITH A POTENTIAL BUYER, OR ENGAGE IN OTHER ANTICOMPETITIVE
PRACTICES, FOR THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF INFLATING THE LISTING OR
PURCHASE PRICE OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK ABOVE THE PARK'S FAIR
MARKET VALUE OR OTHERWISE ENGAGING IN PRACTICES TO PROHIBIT THE
PURCHASE OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK BY A GROUP OR ASSOCIATION OF
HOME OWNERS.
(14.5) A LANDLORD MUST PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION
TO THE DIVISION; THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; A LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR ANY
GROUP OR ASSOCIATION OF HOME OWNERS, OR THEIR ASSIGNEES, THAT HAS
OBTAINED THE APPROVAL OF FIFTY-ONE PERCENT OR MORE OF THE
HOMEOWNERS IN THE PARK WITHIN FOURTEEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING A WRITTEN REQUEST:
(a) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION;
(b) A DISCLOSURE OF ANY DIRECTORS, MEMBERS, OR MANAGERS
SHARED BETWEEN THE LANDLORD AND THE POTENTIAL BUYER OF THE
MOBILE HOME PARK OR ANY OF THE BUYER'S INVESTORS OR AFFILIATES;
(c) A DISCLOSURE OF ALL BENEFICIAL OWNERS OF THE LANDLORD
AND THE POTENTIAL BUYER;
(d) A DISCLOSURE OF ANY LEGAL ENTITIES FORMED OR AMENDED
FOR THE PURPOSE OF THE TRANSACTION AND THE OPERATING AGREEMENT,
ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION, OR BYLAWS OF ANY SUCH LEGAL ENTITIES;
(e) THE DISCLOSURE OF ANY AGREEMENT OTHER THAN THE
PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE LANDLORD AND THE
POTENTIAL BUYER OR THE BUYER'S INVESTORS OR AFFILIATES, INCLUDING
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

ANY AGREEMENT THAT:
(I) RELATES TO THE TRANSACTION TO SELL OR PURCHASE THE
MOBILE HOME PARK;
(II) AFFECTS THE PRICE OR TERMS OF THE TRANSACTION TO SELL OR
PURCHASE THE MOBILE HOME PARK, INCLUDING ANY AGREEMENT IN A
SEPARATE TRANSACTION THAT INCLUDES A REDUCTION IN PRICE, OFFSET, OR
DEDUCTION RELATED TO THE SALE OR PURCHASE OF THE MOBILE HOME
PARK; OR
(III) RELATES TO THE DISTRIBUTION OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF
THE MOBILE HOME PARK OR OTHER ASSETS OR EQUITY INTERESTS;
(f) INFORMATION REGARDING THE BUYER'S SOURCE OF FINANCING,
INCLUDING SPECIFIC LENDERS, IF APPLICABLE, AND WHETHER THE LANDLORD
IS PROVIDING ANY FINANCING DIRECTLY OR THROUGH A PARTNERSHIP
AGREEMENT WITH THE BUYER;
(g) WHETHER THE SALE OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK IS PART OF AN
ASSET, STOCK, OR OTHER EQUITY PURCHASE AND, IF SO, AN EXPLANATION OF
HOW THE PURCHASE PRICE OF THE MOBILE HOME PARK WAS CALCULATED
BASED ON THE PRICE OF THE EQUITIES INVOLVED AND ANY DOCUMENTATION
TO SUPPORT THE CALCULATION OF THE PURCHASE PRICE; AND
(h) AN UNREDACTED COPY OF THE PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-1106, amend (8)
as follows:
38-12-1106. Registration of mobile home parks - process - fees.
(8) (a) The division shall establish by rule a fee that each landlord
shall pay to the division as an annual registration fee for each mobile home
independently owned on rented land within the landlord's mobile home
park.
(b) On and after July 1, 2024, The division may adjust the
REGISTRATION fee ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (8) to cover
the costs associated with complaints filed pursuant to section 38-12-1103
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

(2)(b), and may by rule authorize landlords to charge a resident, as defined
in section 38-12-201.5 (11), a portion of the fee, SO LONG AS THE FEE
ADJUSTMENT COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (8)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A landlord must not charge a home owner or resident more than
SEVENTEEN DOLLARS OR half of the fee, WHICHEVER AMOUNT IS LESS.
(d) The registration fee for each mobile home must be deposited into
the fund.
(e) The division shall review the annual registration fee and, if
necessary, adjust the annual registration fee through rule-making to ensure
it continues to reasonably relate to the cost of administering the program,
SO LONG AS THE FEE ADJUSTMENT COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (8)(c) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the
act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people
at the general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will
take effect January 1, 2027 or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1224

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1224